sample.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwzESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWZ'

SFX A Y 1
SFX A   0     s         .

SFX B Y 2
SFX B   0     ed        [^y]
SFX B   y     ied       y

SFX C Y 3
SFX C   0     ing       [^y]
SFX C   y     ying      y
SFX C   e     ing       e
